Utah statutes.
78B-15-605.   Venue.

Venue for a judicial proceeding to adjudicate parentage is in the county of this state in which:

(1)  the child resides or is found;

(2)  the respondent resides or is found if the child does not reside in this state; or

(3)  a proceeding for probate or administration of the presumed or alleged father's estate has been commenced.

